src/noun-sme-morph.txt
LEXICON DAHPPA !!= * __@CODE@__ the dáhpahuvvá fix
! +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ; Bug1367
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
! +N:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon Bug1367
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px2V ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>X2s%> PxC ;
 +N:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Err/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
! +N+SgGenCmp+Use/NG:%>X4 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>X4 Px3V ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>X4 Px3V ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Sg+Loc:%>X4st%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom+Err/Sub:%>X4k K ;
 +N+Err/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +N+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:%>X8 K ; ! Ditto (?)
 +N+Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell:»W4heapmi%> HEAPMI ;
 +N+Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Ess:»W4heapmi%>X1n K ;
 +N+Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Ess:»W4heapmi%>X1n%> PxC ;
 +N+Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Ess:»W4heapmi%>X7n%> PxC ;
 +N+Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell+Sg+Nom+Err/Sub:»W4hin K ;		!
 +N+Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell:»W4his%> ATTR ;
 +N+Der1+Der2+Der/heapmi+A+Use/-Spell:»W4h EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
! +N+Der1+Der2+Der/huvva+V+IV+Use/-Spell:»W4huvva%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +N+Der1+Der/huhtti+V+TV+Use/-Spell:»W4huhtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
! +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON LAHKI  !!= * __@CODE@__ 
 +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ; Bug1367
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
! +N:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon Bug1367
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px2V ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>X2s%> PxC ;
 +N:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +N+Err/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N+Err/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +N:%>X8 GOADE-IU- ; ! Ditto (?)
 +N:%> DenominalAdjsV1 ;
! +N:%> DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N:%> DenominalNounsV ;



LEXICON BEARRI !!= * __@CODE@__  the *bearáš vs bearaš fix
 +N:%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ; Bug1367
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
 +N:%> GOAHTI-IU-OBL ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
! +N: DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON TAXI !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms goahte-,long/short gen
 +N+SgNomCmp:e%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:e%> K ;
 +N+Ess:e%>n K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:i%>j K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:se%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:se%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:se%>s K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:se%>t K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:si%>jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:si%>jd9 K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:si%>jd9 K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:si%>jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:si%>jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:si%>jgujn K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:e%> Px1V ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Gen:e%> Px1V ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Acc:e%> Px1V ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Nom:e%> Px2V ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Ill:e%>s PxC ; !^P^
 +N+SgGenCmp:se%> R ; !^NG^  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +N+Sg+Gen:se%> Px3V ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Acc:se%> Px3V ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Loc:se%>st PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Com:si%>jn PxC ; !^P^
! +N+Pl+Nom:si%>jd Px1C ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Gen:si%>jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Acc:si%>jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Ill:si%>jdasa PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Loc:si%>jn PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Com:si%>jgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:si%>jd PxPlComC ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Gen:se%> Px2V ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Acc:se%> Px2V ; !^P^


LEXICON ACTOR !!= * __@CODE@__ +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG 
 +N+NomAg+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG: ACTORCT ;

LEXICON ACTORCT !!= * __@CODE@__ Long compound-forms
 :%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +Sg+Nom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:%> Px3V ; Bug1367
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»viđá K ;
 :%> EssV ;
! :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon Bug1367
 +Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px2V ;  
 +Sg+Ill:%>X2s%> PxC ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Err/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +Err/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>X2 GOADA- ; ! AG Px

LEXICON ACTORLONGSHORT !!= * __@CODE@__ +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG 
! +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG: ACTORLONGSHORTCT ; ! SNM 16.4.2014: commented out
! since it is specified for each entry, and not always the same - no compound
! specification instead:
 ACTORLONGSHORTCT ;

LEXICON ACTORLONGSHORTCT !!= * __@CODE@__ Sometimes long compound-forms
 +N+NomAg:%> GOAHTILONGSHORTCMP ;
 +N+NomAg+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +N+NomAg+Sg+Nom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:%> Px3V ; Bug1367
 +N+NomAg+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N+NomAg:%> EssV ;
! +N+NomAg:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon Bug1367
 +N+NomAg+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+NomAg+Sg+Gen:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+NomAg+Sg+Acc:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+NomAg+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px2V ; 
 +N+NomAg+Sg+Ill:%>X2s%> PxC ;
 +N+NomAg:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+NomAg+Err/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+NomAg:%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N+NomAg+Err/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N+NomAg:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N+NomAg:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +N+NomAg:%>X8 GOADE- ; ! Ditto (?)

LEXICON ACTORSHORT !!= * __@CODE@__ +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG 
 +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG: ACTORSHORTCT ;

LEXICON ACTORSHORTCT !!= * __@CODE@__ Sometimes long compound-forms
  +N+NomAg+SgNomCmp@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@:%>X7@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@ R ;
 +N+NomAg+SgNomCmp+Err/Sub@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@:%>@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@ R ;
 +N+NomAg+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +N+NomAg+Sg+Nom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:%> Px3V ; Bug1367
 +N+NomAg+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N+NomAg:%> EssV ;
! +N+NomAg:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon Bug1367
 +N+NomAg+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+NomAg+Sg+Gen:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+NomAg+Sg+Acc:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+NomAg+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px2V ; 
 +N+NomAg+Sg+Ill:%>X2s%> PxC ;
 +N+NomAg:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+NomAg+Err/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+NomAg+Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +N+NomAg+Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
 +N+NomAg+Sg+Gen:%>X4 Px3V ; 
 +N+NomAg+Sg+Acc:%>X4 Px3V ;
 +N+NomAg+Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +N+NomAg+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+NomAg+Sg+Loc:%>X4st%> PxC ;
 +N+NomAg+Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 +N+NomAg+Pl+Nom+Err/Sub:%>X4k K ;
 +N+NomAg+SgGenCmp+Err/Sub: R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +N+NomAg+Err/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N+NomAg:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N+NomAg:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +N+NomAg:%>X8 GOADE- ; ! Ditto (?)

LEXICON ACTORLEX !!= * __@CODE@__ Long compound-forms
 +N:%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:%> Px3V ; Bug1367
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»viđá K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
! +N:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon Bug1367
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px2V ;  
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>X2s%> PxC ;
 +N:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Err/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N+Err/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px

!LEXICON ACTORLONGSHORTTV not in use at the moment!+CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG +CmpN/SgLeft +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft
! +N+NomAg+CmpN/SgN:%> R ;
! +N+NomAg+CmpN/SgN@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@:%>@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@ R ;
! +N+NomAg+CmpN/SgN@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@:%>X7@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@ R ;
! +N+NomAg+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +N+NomAg+Sg+Nom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:%> Px3V ; Bug1367
! +N+NomAg+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+NomAg+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
! +N+NomAg:%> EssV ;
! +N+NomAg: DenominalAdjsV1Long ; !not plausible
! +N+NomAg: DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not plausible
! +N+NomAg: DenominalNounsV ; !not plausible
! +N+NomAg:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon Bug1367
 ! +N+Sg+Nom+NomAg:%>X2 Px1V ;
! +N+NomAg+Sg+Gen+NomAg:%>X2 Px1V ;
! +N+NomAg+Sg+Acc+NomAg:%>X2 Px1V ;
! +N+NomAg+Sg+Nom+NomAg:%>X2 Px2V ;
! +N+NomAg+Sg+Ill+NomAg:%>X2s%> PxC ;
! +N+NomAg:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +N+NomAg+Err/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +N+NomAg:%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
! +N+NomAg+Err/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
! +N+NomAg:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
! +N+NomAg:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +N+NomAg:%>X8 GOADE- ; ! Ditto (?)




LEXICON STAHTA !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. Non-Gradating a-Nouns; i-Illative
 +N:%> STAHTACASE ;
 +N:%>X3 GOAHTAI ;
 +N+Err/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ;
! +N:%>W9 GOAHTAI ; illative -ai only for iija-words
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON IIJA !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. Non-Gradating a-Nouns; a-Illative
 +N:%> STAHTACASE ;
 +N:%> GOAHTAI ;
 +N+Use/NG:%>X3 GOAHTAI ;
 +N+Err/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON GADDI !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Nouns with Comparative Forms.  Short nom-compound-forms, long gen.
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ; Bug1367
 +N+SgNomCmp@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@:%>X7@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@ R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@:%>@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@ R ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 +N+Ess:%>n K ;
 +N+Ess:%>n%> PxC ;
! +N:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon Bug1367
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px2V ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>X2s%> PxC ;
 +N:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Err/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N+Err/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +N:%> GOAHTE- ;
 +N+Der/A+A+Sem/Plc:%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 +N: DenominalNounsV ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
! +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;

LEXICON GADDILONG !!= * __@CODE@__ long compound forms, short -heapme
 +N:%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ; Bug1367
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»viđi K ;
 +N:%> EssV ;
! +N:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon Bug1367
  +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%>X2 Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X2 Px2V ;  
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>X2s%> PxC ;
 +N:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N+Err/Sub:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +N:%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 +N+Err/Sub:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +N:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +N+Der/A+A:%>X4 BU/MUS ;
! +N: DenominalAdjsV1Short ;
! +N: DenominalAdjsV2 ;
! +N: DenominalNounsV ;
